tests/added-n forms - partial added-n forms.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-optimised-lookup
      Gen: ../khk.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../khk.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "толгой = head":
    толгой<n><nom> : толгой
    толгой<n><acc> : толгойг
    толгой<n><gen> : толгойн
    толгой<n><abl> : толгойноос
    толгой<n><dat> : толгойд
    толгой<n><pl><nom> : толгойнууд

 "мэлхий = frog":
    мэлхий<n><nom> : мэлхий
    мэлхий<n><acc> : мэлхийг
    мэлхий<n><gen> : мэлхийн
    мэлхий<n><abl> : мэлхийнээс
    мэлхий<n><dat> : мэлхийд
    мэлхий<n><pl><nom> : мэлхийнүүд

 "гахай = pig":
    гахай<n><nom> : гахай
    гахай<n><acc> : гахайг
    гахай<n><gen> : гахайн
    гахай<n><abl> : гахайнаас
    гахай<n><dat> : гахайд
